Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA ORCHESTRA.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Minnesota Orchestra for arts and cultural heritage programming in musical performance. new text end